Utah statutes.
78B-14-505 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer who willfully fails to comply with an income withholding order issued by another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

